Missouri, session 2026, HB2167.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 27.020, RSMo, is repealed and two new sections enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as sections 21.158 and 27.020, to read as follows:
21.158. The general assembly, the house, or the senate may employ legislative
security officers of the house or senate who may carry firearms when necessary for the
proper discharge of their duties. Such legislative security officers, who shall be licensed
peace officers under the peace officer standards and training program (POST), shall
have all powers granted to law enforcement officers in this state that are necessary to
ensure the proper security and functioning of the general assembly, including the power
to apprehend and arrest persons.
27.020. 1. The attorney general is hereby authorized to appoint such assistant
attorneys general as may be necessary to properly perform the duties of his or her office and
shall fix the compensation of such assistants within the limits of the amount appropriated by
the general assembly. Said assistant attorneys general shall hold their office at the pleasure of
the attorney general, shall possess the same qualifications as the attorney general, and before
entering upon the discharge of their duties shall each take and subscribe to an oath to support
the Constitution of the United States and of the state of Missouri and to faithfully demean
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2167 2
themselves in office. It shall be their duty to assist the attorney general in his or her official
duties with power and authority under his or her direction to represent him or her in the
discharge of all the duties of his or her office.
2. The attorney general may, at the request of any officer, department, board, bureau,
commission or agency of the state, assign assistant attorneys general to perform the duties
prescribed by law before or upon behalf of such officer, department, board, bureau,
commission or agency and may, upon request as aforesaid, from time to time reassign such
assistants.
3. The attorney general is also authorized to appoint a chief clerk, stenographers,
typists, clerks, [investigators] and such other employees as shall be necessary to properly
perform the duties of his or her office [and shall fix the compensation of persons thus
employed within the limits of the amount appropriated by the general assembly]. Said
employees shall serve during the pleasure of the attorney general. [The assistant attorneys
general and the chief clerk, stenographers, typists, clerks, investigators and other employees
shall be paid in the same manner and at the same time as the attorney general. The
compensation and expenses of said assistants and employees may be paid out of any state or
federal funds appropriated to said department for such purposes.]
4. The attorney general is further authorized to appoint commissioned and
noncommissioned investigators, as shall be necessary to properly perform the duties of
his or her office. Investigators shall serve at the pleasure of the attorney general. Each
commissioned investigator, upon appointment, shall take and subscribe an oath of office
to support the constitution and laws of the United States and the state of Missouri and
shall receive a certificate of appointment, a copy of which shall be filed with the
secretary of state, issued by the attorney general or his or her designee granting such
commissioned investigator all the same powers of arrest held by peace officers to
maintain order and preserve the peace in any matter in which the attorney general is
appointed or assigned in accordance with the law. Commissioned investigators may
assist law enforcement agencies when requested. The certificate of appointment of each
commissioned investigator may be withdrawn at any time by the attorney general.
Commissioned investigators shall comply with all peace officer standards required by
chapter 590.
5. The attorney general is authorized to fix the compensation of persons
employed by him or her within the limits of the amount appropriated by the general
assembly. The assistant attorneys general and the chief clerk, stenographers, typists,
clerks, investigators, and other employees shall be paid in the same manner and at the
same time as the attorney general. The compensation and expenses of such assistants,

HB 2167 3
investigators, and other employees may be paid out of any state or federal funds
appropriated to such department for such purposes.
Section B. Because immediate action is necessary to ensure safety within the capitol
building during the current legislative session and thereafter, the enactment of section 21.158
of section A of this act is deemed necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
health, welfare, peace, and safety, and is hereby declared to be an emergency act within the
meaning of the constitution, and the enactment of section 21.158 of section A of this act shall
be in full force and effect upon its passage and approval.
✔